Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means a ward,  as defined in ORS 419A.004, in the custody of the Department
of Human Services under ORS 419B.337.
(b) “Maintenance cost” means a payment to a foster parent or relative  caregiver for the
costs of providing a child with  food, clothing, housing, daily supervision, personal incidentals
and transportation.
(2) Except for moneys received  pursuant to a child support order or as otherwise spe-
cifically required by federal or state law, court order or other  legal instrument, the depart-
ment may not use  any funds, benefits, payments, proceeds, settlements, awards,
inheritances, wages or any other moneys  received by the department on behalf of a child for
the purpose of maintenance costs.
SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this 2023 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means a ward, as defined in ORS 419A.004, in the  custody of the Department of
Human Services under ORS 419B.337.
(b) “Maintenance cost” means a payment to a foster parent or relative caregiver for the  costs
of providing a child with food, clothing,  housing, daily supervision, personal incidentals and trans-
portation.
(2) Except for moneys received pursuant to a child support  order or as otherwise specifically
required by federal or state law, court order or  other legal instrument, the department may not use
any funds, benefits, payments,  proceeds, settlements, awards, inheritances, wages or any other
moneys received by the department on behalf of a child for the purpose of maintenance costs.
(3)(a) The department shall  establish separate accounts for each child for whom the de-
partment will receive any  funds, benefits, payments, proceeds, settlements, awards,
inheritances, wages or any other moneys.
(b) The department shall, in  collaboration with the State Treasurer, administer each
separate account established under this subsection consistent  with the department’s
fiduciary duties, in the best interest of the child for whom the separate account is estab-
Enrolled Senate Bill 556 (SB 556-B) Page 1
lished and in compliance with any applicable state  or federal law, court order or other legal
instrument.
(c) The department may make distributions from a separate account for expenditures
related to the personal needs of the child, including:
(A) Tuition, tutoring and training, including the costs of application fees, books,  equip-
ment and testing;
(B) Transportation to work or training or to maintain family connections;
(C) Travel for educational purposes;
(D) Expenses related to the child’s transition into  adulthood, including first and last
months’ rent, housing application  fees and one-time purchases by the child of essential
household supplies, including furniture, kitchen equipment, linens and cleaning supplies;
(E) Technology, including the purchase of a  computer, needed to advance the child’s
skills in school, work or independence or to maintain connections with siblings;
(F) Clothing or supplies for special events typical  for a person of the child’s age and
culture; and
(G) Instruments, books, supplies, fees and equipment to support  the child in pursuing
hobbies, sports, the arts and other special skills.
(d) Except as required by state or federal law  or as specifically provided in paragraph (c)
of this subsection, the department may not make  distributions from a child’s separate ac-
count for expenses related to the duties of a legal  custodian as described in ORS 419B.373 (1),
(2) or (3).
(4) Unless otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, at  the request of the child or the
child’s attorney or representative, the department may:
(a) Direct that any moneys described  in subsection (3) of this section that would be re-
ceived by the department on behalf of  the child instead be paid directly into a trust account,
or subaccount of a trust account, that  is established by the department under ORS 430.195
for the purpose of receiving moneys payable to  the child and that earns interest for the
benefit of the child; or
(b) Distribute any moneys described in subsection (3) of  this section that are held by the
department for the child to any of the following privately held  accounts established for the
sole benefit of the child:
(A) An Oregon Uniform Transfers to Minors  Act account under ORS 126.805 to 126.886
that delays transfer of the custodial property until the child attains 25 years of age;
(B) An account established under ORS 178.335 within the Oregon  529 Savings Network in
the name of the child;
(C) An  ABLE account established under ORS 178.380 with the child named as the desig-
nated beneficiary;
(D) A trust established  under ORS chapter 130, if the trust names the child as the sole
beneficiary and appoints an independent, qualified trustee; or
(E) Any other privately held account described by the department by rule.
(5) Nothing in this  section requires the department or the State Treasurer to establish
or coordinate  the establishment of, or, except as required by state or federal law, monitor
or verify the viability of an account described in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(6) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 419B.373 is amended to read:
419B.373. A person, agency or institution having legal custody of a ward has the following duties
and authority:
(1) To have physical custody and control of the ward.
(2) To supply the ward with food, clothing, shelter and incidental necessaries.
(3) To provide the ward with care, education and discipline.
Enrolled Senate Bill 556 (SB 556-B) Page 2
(4) To authorize ordinary medical, dental, psychiatric, psychological, hygienic  or other remedial
care and treatment for the ward, and, in an  emergency where the ward’s safety appears urgently to
require it, to authorize surgery or other extraordinary care.
(5) To make such reports and  to supply such information to the court as the court may from
time to time require.
(6) To apply for any Social Security benefits,  public assistance or medical assistance, as defined
in ORS 414.025, to which the ward is otherwise entitled and , subject to section 1  of this 2023 Act,
to use the benefits or assistance to provide for the care of the ward.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1 (5), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House  Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for child welfare pro-
grams, is increased by $270,797 for child in care maintenance costs.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter  __, Oregon Laws
2023 (Enrolled House Bill  5026), collected or received by the Department of Human Services,
for child welfare programs, is increased by $117,722 for child in care maintenance costs.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled  House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys  or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts
and including federal funds for indirect  cost recovery, Social Security Supplemental Security
Income recoveries and the Child Care and  Development Fund, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 5026), collected or received by the Department of Human  Services for child welfare pro-
grams is decreased by $388,519.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  Human Services by section 1 (7), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill  5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, for
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased by $193,572  for child in care
maintenance costs.
SECTION 8. (1) The amendments to section 1 of this 2023 Act by section 2 of this 2023
Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Department of Human Services and the State Treasurer may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary for the
department and the State Treasurer to carry out the provisions of the amendments  to sec-
tion 1 of this 2023 Act by section 2 of this 2023 Act on or after the  operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 556 (SB 556-B) Page 3
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 556 (SB 556-B) Page 4